Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [137.345] EMPOWERING SMALL MINNESOTA COMMUNITIES PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Program" means the empowering small Minnesota communities program established by the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) "Small community" means a local unit of government having a population of fewer than 15,000 or a collaboration of more than one local unit of government each having a population of fewer than 15,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program assistance. new text end new text begin (a) An appropriation under the program is for small community partnerships on infrastructure project analysis and development as provided in this section. new text end new text begin (b) Support and assistance under the program must be prioritized for political subdivisions and federally recognized Tribal governments based on insufficient capacity to undertake project development and apply for state or federal infrastructure grants. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Uses. new text end new text begin (a) An appropriation under the program is available for: new text end new text begin (1) project partnership activities in the Regional Sustainable Development Partnerships, the Center for Transportation Studies, the Minnesota Design Center, the Humphrey School of Public Affairs, the Center for Urban and Regional Affairs, or other related entities; and new text end new text begin (2) support and assistance to small communities that includes: new text end new text begin (i) methods to incorporate consideration of sustainability, resiliency, and adaptation to the impacts of climate change; and new text end new text begin (ii) identification and cross-sector analysis of any potential associated projects and efficiencies through coordinated investments in other infrastructure or assets. new text end new text begin (b) An agreement with a small community may provide for infrastructure project analysis and development activities that include but are not limited to planning, scoping, analysis, predesign, and design. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Program information. new text end new text begin From an appropriation under the program, the regents must maintain information about the program on a website that, at a minimum, must include: new text end new text begin (1) a review of the program and implementation; new text end new text begin (2) a summary of projects under the program; new text end new text begin (3) financial information that identifies sources and uses of funds; and new text end new text begin (4) direction on applications for partnership assistance. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; EMPOWERING SMALL MINNESOTA COMMUNITIES PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the empowering small Minnesota communities program under Minnesota Statutes, section 137.345. new text end